Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.075

Agreements with Washington State University, governmental entities, and other organizations.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with Washington State University, the United States department of agriculture, other state and federal agencies, and any other organization in order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1999 c 144 s 8; 1961 c 83 s 12. Formerly RCW 15.14.120.]